src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON VIHTTALOGIOKTA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
   okta+Num+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:htta#logi#akta          K                ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Nom:htta#logi#okta          K                ;
             okta+Num+Ess:htta#logi#okta%>n       K                ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Acc:htta#logi#okta          K                ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Gen:htta#logi#ovtta         K                ;
       okta+Num+Cmp/SgGen:htta#logi#ovtta         NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Loc:htta#logi#ovtta%>s      K                ;
 okta+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:htta#logi#ovtta%>n      K                ; ! !SOUTH
          okta+Num+Sg+Ill:htta#logi#okti%>j       K                ;
     okta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#ovtta         K                ;
     okta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta#logi#ovtta         K                ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#ovtta%>jn K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Nom:htta#logi#ovtta%>t      K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Acc:htta#logi#okºta%>X5jd   K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Gen:htta#logi#okºta%>X5jd   K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Ill:htta#logi#ovtta%>ide    K                ;
     okta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#okºta%>X5jd   K                ;
     okta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:htta#logi#okºta%>X5jd   K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#ovtta%>jn K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Com:htta#logi#ovtta%>jguin  K                ;

LEXICON GOLBMALOGIGUOKTE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          guokte+Num+Sg+Nom:#logi#guokte             K                ;
             guokte+Num+Ess:#logi#guokti%>n          K                ;
          guokte+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#guokte             K                ;
          guokte+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#guovtti            K                ;
       guokte+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#guovtte            NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          guokte+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#guovtti%>s         K                ;
 guokte+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#guovtti%>n         K                ; ! !SOUTH
          guokte+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#guoktá%>j          K                ;
     guokte+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#guovtti            K                ;
     guokte+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#guovtti            K                ;
          guokte+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#guvtti%>jn K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#guovtti%>t         K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#guokºte%>X5jd      K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#guokºte%>X5jd      K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#guokºte%>X5jd      K                ;
     guokte+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#guokºte%>X5jd      K                ;
     guokte+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#guokºte%>X5jd      K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#guvtti%>jde        K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#guvtti%>jn K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#guvtti%>jguin      K                ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGIGUOKTE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          guokte+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#guokte         K                ;
             guokte+Num+Ess:#logi#guokti%>n          K                ;
          guokte+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#guokte             K                ;
          guokte+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#guovtti            K                ;
       guokte+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#guovtte            NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          guokte+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#guovtti%>s         K                ;
 guokte+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#guovtti%>n         K                ; ! !SOUTH
     guokte+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#guovtti            K                ;
     guokte+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#guovtti            K                ;
          guokte+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#guoktá%>j          K                ;
          guokte+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#guvtti%>jn K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#guovtti%>t         K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#guokºte%>X5jd      K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#guokºte%>X5jd      K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#guvtti%>jde        K                ;
     guokte+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#guokºte%>X5jd      K                ;
     guokte+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#guokºte%>X5jd      K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#guvtti%>jn K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#guvtti%>jguin      K                ;


LEXICON GUOKTELOGIGUOKTE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          guokte+Num+Sg+Nom:e#logi#guokte             K                ;
             guokte+Num+Ess:e#logi#guokti%>n          K                ;
          guokte+Num+Sg+Acc:e#logi#guokte             K                ;
          guokte+Num+Sg+Gen:e#logi#guovtti            K                ;
       guokte+Num+Cmp/SgGen:e#logi#guovtte            NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          guokte+Num+Sg+Loc:e#logi#guovtti%>s         K                ;
 guokte+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e#logi#guovtti%>n         K                ; ! !SOUTH
          guokte+Num+Sg+Ill:e#logi#guoktá%>j          K                ;
     guokte+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#logi#guovtti            K                ;
     guokte+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#logi#guovtti            K                ;
          guokte+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#guvtti%>jn K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Nom:e#logi#guovtti%>t         K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Acc:e#logi#guokºte%>X5jd      K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Gen:e#logi#guokºte%>X5jd      K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Ill:e#logi#guvtti%>jde        K                ;
     guokte+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:e#logi#guokºte%>X5jd      K                ;
     guokte+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:e#logi#guokºte%>X5jd      K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#guvtti%>jn K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Com:e#logi#guvtti%>jguin      K                ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGIGUOKTE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          guokte+Num+Sg+Nom:htta#logi#guokte         K                ;
             guokte+Num+Ess:htta#logi#guokti%>n      K                ;
          guokte+Num+Sg+Acc:htta#logi#guokte         K                ;
          guokte+Num+Sg+Gen:htta#logi#guovtti        K                ;
       guokte+Num+Cmp/SgGen:htta#logi#guovtte        NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          guokte+Num+Sg+Loc:htta#logi#guovtti%>s     K                ;
 guokte+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:htta#logi#guovtti%>n     K                ; ! !SOUTH
          guokte+Num+Sg+Ill:htta#logi#guoktá%>j      K                ;
     guokte+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#guovtti        K                ;
     guokte+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta#logi#guovtti        K                ;
          guokte+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#guvtti%>jn K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Nom:htta#logi#guovtti%>t     K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Acc:htta#logi#guokºte%>X5jd  K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Gen:htta#logi#guokºte%>X5jd  K                ;
     guokte+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#guokºte%>X5jd  K                ;
     guokte+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:htta#logi#guokºte%>X5jd  K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Ill:htta#logi#guvtti%>jde    K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#guvtti%>jn K                ;
          guokte+Num+Pl+Com:htta#logi#guvtti%>jguin  K                ;

LEXICON 21TO99   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
   guoktelogi:guokºt         GUOKTELOGIGUOKTE   ;
   golbmalogi:golbma         GOLBMALOGIGUOKTE   ;
 njealljelogi:njeallj        GUOKTELOGIGUOKTE   ;
   vihttalogi:vi             VIHTTALOGIOKTA     ;
   vihttalogi:vi             VIHTTALOGIGUOKTE   ;
   guhttalogi:gu             VIHTTALOGIOKTA     ;
   guhttalogi:gu             VIHTTALOGIGUOKTE   ;
    čiežalogi:čieža          GOLBMALOGIGUOKTE   ;
    giežalogi:gieža          GOLBMALOGIGUOKTE   ;
   gávccilogi:gávcci         GAVCCILOGIGUOKTE   ;
    gákcilogi:gákci          GAVCCILOGIGUOKTE   ;
    ovccilogi:ovcci          GAVCCILOGIGUOKTE   ;
